Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.160

Costs.

In any action to enforce a support or maintenance order under this chapter, the prevailing party is entitled to a recovery of costs, including an award for reasonable attorney fees. An obligor may not be considered a prevailing party under this section unless the obligee has acted in bad faith in connection with the proceeding in question.

[ 1993 c 426 s 13; 1984 c 260 s 25.]